fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON pakam-
pakam-/:pakam/ -acâp- "weight: 24.597427" ; ! n=2/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -ah1 "weight: 16.648611" ; ! n=13/68 [17/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -ahw1 "weight: 15.205158" ; ! n=8/68 [117/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -cihc- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/68 [1/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -hkw- "weight: 23.681137" ; ! n=5/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -ht- "weight: 24.191962" ; ! n=3/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -htatâ "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -htin1 "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -htit "weight: 24.597427" ; ! n=2/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -m1 "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -paýi "weight: 24.597427" ; ! n=2/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -sim1 "weight: 18.868720" ; ! n=3/68 [8/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -sin1 "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/68 [5/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -sit- "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -sk1 "weight: 24.597427" ; ! n=2/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -skaw1 "weight: 19.156402" ; ! n=3/68 [6/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -skw2- "weight: 23.681137" ; ! n=5/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -ton- "weight: 23.904280" ; ! n=4/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -âkan2 "weight: 18.714569" ; ! n=2/68 [14/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -âp- "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -âpisk- "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -âskw- "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -âst- "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -âstan "weight: 25.290575" ; ! n=1/68 [0/145429]
pakam-/:pakam/ -âtihp- "weight: 24.597427" ; ! n=2/68 [0/145429]

LEXICON pakask-
pakask-/:pakask/ -amo2 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -asin- "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -asinâso "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -asinâstê "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -ht1 "weight: 27.195663" ; ! n=5/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -htaw "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -htâkosi "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -htâkwan "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -i "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/47 [2/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -isi "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -n2 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -naw "weight: 19.744189" ; ! n=5/47 [2/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -nâkosi "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -nâkwan "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/47 [1/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -owê "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -âp- "weight: 27.418806" ; ! n=4/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -âpaht "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -âpam "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -êýi- "weight: 27.195663" ; ! n=5/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -êýiht "weight: 27.706488" ; ! n=3/47 [0/145429]
pakask-/:pakask/ -êýim "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/47 [0/145429]

LEXICON pakastawê-
pakastawê-/:pakastawê/ -ah1 "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=2/12 [4/145429]
pakastawê-/:pakastawê/ -ahw1 "weight: 18.955731" ; ! n=2/12 [11/145429]
pakastawê-/:pakastawê/ -n1 "weight: 26.725659" ; ! n=2/12 [0/145429]
pakastawê-/:pakastawê/ -paýi "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/12 [3/145429]
pakastawê-/:pakastawê/ -paýin "weight: 27.418806" ; ! n=1/12 [0/145429]
pakastawê-/:pakastawê/ wêp- "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=4/12 [2/145429]

LEXICON pakis-
pakis-/:pakis/ -âp- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/4 [2/145429]
pakis-/:pakis/ -âpaht "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/4 [0/145429]
pakis-/:pakis/ -âpam "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/4 [2/145429]

LEXICON pakit-
pakit-/:pakit/ -ahw(â) "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/96 [1/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -ahwâ "weight: 16.229663" ; ! n=8/96 [42/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -asin- "weight: 23.739977" ; ! n=1/96 [0/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -atâ- "weight: 19.274185" ; ! n=4/96 [4/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -atâht "weight: 23.046830" ; ! n=2/96 [0/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -atâmo1 "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=2/96 [4/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -n1 "weight: 12.356913" ; ! n=29/96 [557/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -paýi "weight: 23.046830" ; ! n=2/96 [0/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -âpêk- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=4/96 [1/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -âskw- "weight: 23.739977" ; ! n=1/96 [0/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -êýi- "weight: 14.831534" ; ! n=17/96 [80/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -êýiht "weight: 15.924281" ; ! n=8/96 [57/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -êýim "weight: 16.714055" ; ! n=9/96 [23/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ -î1 "weight: 18.463255" ; ! n=2/96 [18/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ pihkw- "weight: 23.739977" ; ! n=1/96 [0/145429]
pakit-/:pakit/ wêp- "weight: 18.827898" ; ! n=5/96 [5/145429]

LEXICON pakonê-
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -ah1 "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/23 [2/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -ahw1 "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -ht- "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=2/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -htin1 "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -htit "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=2/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -isi "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -n1 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=4/23 [1/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -sim1 "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=2/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -sin1 "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -sk1 "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ -skaw1 "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ h "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ kîsik- "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ kîsikw- "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/23 [0/145429]
pakonê-/:pakonê/ y "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=1/23 [6/145429]

LEXICON pakos1-
pakos1-/:pakos/ -êýi- "weight: 15.169478" ; ! n=10/20 [97/145429]
pakos1-/:pakos/ -êýiht "weight: 17.615957" ; ! n=4/20 [21/145429]
pakos1-/:pakos/ -êýihtâkosi "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=1/20 [0/145429]
pakos1-/:pakos/ -êýihtâkwan "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=1/20 [0/145429]
pakos1-/:pakos/ -êýim "weight: 16.329746" ; ! n=4/20 [76/145429]

LEXICON pakos2-
pakos2-/:pakos/ -î1 "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=9/9 [1/145429]

LEXICON pakw-
pakw-/:pakw/ -cê "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/27 [2/145429]
pakw-/:pakw/ -cê- "weight: 24.786917" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
pakw-/:pakw/ -piT "weight: 24.786917" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
pakw-/:pakw/ -pit "weight: 24.786917" ; ! n=1/27 [0/145429]
pakw-/:pakw/ -âT "weight: 14.464545" ; ! n=13/27 [151/145429]
pakw-/:pakw/ -ât "weight: 14.915875" ; ! n=10/27 [125/145429]

LEXICON pakwahtê-
pakwahtê-/:pakwahtê/ -h "weight: 17.076961" ; ! n=9/9 [16/145429]

LEXICON pakwanaw-
pakwanaw-/:pakwanaw/ -aht4 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/14 [1/145429]
pakwanaw-/:pakwanaw/ -isi "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=2/14 [0/145429]
pakwanaw-/:pakwanaw/ -m1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/14 [0/145429]
pakwanaw-/:pakwanaw/ -êýi "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=2/14 [0/145429]
pakwanaw-/:pakwanaw/ -êýi- "weight: 29.315926" ; ! n=3/14 [0/145429]
pakwanaw-/:pakwanaw/ -êýiht "weight: 29.315926" ; ! n=3/14 [0/145429]
pakwanaw-/:pakwanaw/ -êýim "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=2/14 [0/145429]

LEXICON pakwanê-
pakwanê-/:pakwanê/ -ah1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/2 [1/145429]
pakwanê-/:pakwanê/ -htawak- "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON pakwat1-
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -askamikw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/18 [1/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -astimw "weight: 26.750977" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -i "weight: 19.051042" ; ! n=4/18 [5/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -âhtikw "weight: 26.750977" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -ôs- "weight: 25.364683" ; ! n=4/18 [0/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -ôsân "weight: 26.057830" ; ! n=2/18 [0/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -ôsân- "weight: 26.750977" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ -ôsê "weight: 26.750977" ; ! n=1/18 [0/145429]
pakwat1-/:pakwat/ askiy--1 "weight: 17.451654" ; ! n=3/18 [33/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 pakam- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=59/27654 [168/145429]
0 pakask- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=29/27654 [4/145429]
0 pakastawê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=12/27654 [20/145429]
0 pakis- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [2/145429]
0 pakit- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=68/27654 [697/145429]
0 pakonê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=20/27654 [9/145429]
0 pakos1- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=10/27654 [97/145429]
0 pakos2- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=7/27654 [1/145429]
0 pakw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=26/27654 [277/145429]
0 pakwahtê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=7/27654 [16/145429]
0 pakwanaw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=9/27654 [1/145429]
0 pakwanê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [1/145429]
0 pakwat1- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=14/27654 [39/145429]
LEXICON o2-
o2-/:o/ pakam- "weight: 23.368762" ; ! n=1/392 [0/145429]
o2-/:o/ pakit- "weight: 18.581038" ; ! n=4/392 [8/145429]
o2-/:o/ pakos2- "weight: 22.675615" ; ! n=2/392 [0/145429]
